Hawaii statutes.
[§190D-24] Konohiki fishing rights.
(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not abridge or alter in any way
konohiki fishing rights recognized in chapter 187A, including the right to
sublease private konohiki fishing grounds for marine activities. No lease
shall be granted by the board which conflicts with or impairs konohiki fishing
rights.

(b) Any traditional fishing or marine activity
conducted within konohiki fishing grounds is subject to all applicable state
laws and rules enacted pursuant to the State's police powers over fisheries and
navigable waters. [L 1986, c 91, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next